Hawaii, session 2026, SB2149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 584A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§584A-    Domestic abuse; exemption from mediation in parentage proceedings.  (a)  In contested parentage proceedings where there are allegations of domestic abuse, the court shall not require a party alleging the domestic abuse to participate in any component of any mediation program against the wishes of that party. The court may order mediation or refer the parties to mediation only if: (1)  Mediation is authorized by the alleged victim of the domestic abuse; (2)  Mediation is provided, in a specialized manner that protects the safety of the alleged victim, by a mediator who is trained in the field of domestic abuse; and (3)  The alleged victim and any other party may have a supporting person designated pursuant to section 658H‑10, including but not limited to an attorney or other individual, to accompany the party and participate in the mediation. (b)  A mediator who receives a referral or order from a court to conduct mediation shall screen for the occurrence of domestic abuse between the parties.  A mediator shall not engage in mediation when it appears to the mediator, or when either party asserts, that domestic abuse has occurred, unless: (1)  The alleged victim of the domestic abuse authorizes mediation; (2)  A mediator who is trained in the field of domestic abuse provides mediation in a specialized manner that protects the safety of the alleged victim; and (3)  The alleged victim and any other party may have a supporting person designated pursuant to section 658H‑10, including but not limited to an attorney or other individual, to accompany the party and participate in the mediation. (c)  The court shall not require a party alleging domestic abuse to participate in any component of any mediation program against the wishes of that party if a temporary restraining order or a protective order is in effect with regard to the parties. (d)  If a party has alleged domestic abuse and a temporary restraining order or a protective order is not in effect with regard to the parties, the court may order mediation or refer either party to mediation only if all of the conditions specified in subsection (b) are met. (e)  For the purposes of this section, "domestic abuse" has the same meaning as defined in section 586-1." SECTION 2.  Section 580-41.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§580-41.5  [Battered spouses;] Domestic abuse; exemption from mediation in divorce proceedings.  (a)  In contested divorce proceedings where there are allegations of [spousal] domestic abuse, the court shall not require a party alleging the [spousal] domestic abuse to participate in any component of any mediation program against the wishes of that party.  The court may order mediation or refer the parties to mediation only if: (1)  Mediation is authorized by the alleged victim of the domestic abuse; (2)  Mediation is provided, in a specialized manner that protects the safety of the alleged victim, by a mediator who is trained in the field of domestic abuse; and (3)  The alleged victim and any other party may have a supporting person designated pursuant to section 658H‑10, including but not limited to an attorney or other individual, to accompany the party and participate in the mediation. (b) A mediator who receives a referral or order from a court to conduct mediation shall screen for the occurrence of [family violence] domestic abuse between the parties.  A mediator shall not engage in mediation when it appears to the mediator, or when either party asserts, that [family violence] domestic abuse has occurred, unless: (1)  [Mediation is authorized by the victim of the alleged family violence;] The alleged victim of the domestic abuse authorizes mediation; (2)  [Mediation is provided in a specialized manner that protects the safety of the victim by a] A mediator who is trained [in family violence; and] in the field of domestic abuse provides mediation in a specialized manner that protects the safety of the alleged victim; and (3)  The alleged victim [is permitted to have in attendance at mediation, a supporting person of the victim's choice including but not limited to an attorney or advocate.  If the victim chooses to exercise such option, any other party to the mediation will be permitted to have in attendance at mediation, a supporting person of the party's choice including but not limited to an attorney or advocate.] and any other party may have a supporting person designated pursuant to section 658H-10, including but not limited to an attorney or other individual, to accompany the party and participate in the mediation. (c) [In] If a temporary restraining order or a protective order is in effect with regard to the parties of a proceeding concerning the custody or visitation of a child, [if a protective order is in effect,] the court shall not require a party alleging [family violence] domestic abuse to participate in any component of any mediation program against the wishes of that party. (d) [In] If a party has alleged domestic abuse and a temporary restraining order or a protective order is not in effect with regard to the parties of a proceeding concerning the custody or visitation of a child, [if there is an allegation of family violence and a protective order is not in effect,] the court may order mediation or refer either party to mediation only if[: (1)  Mediation is authorized by the victim of the alleged family violence; (2)  Mediation is provided in a specialized manner that protects the safety of the victim by a mediator who is trained in family violence; and (3)  The victim is permitted to have in attendance at mediation, a supporting person of the victim's choice including but not limited to an attorney or advocate.  If the victim chooses to exercise such option, any other party to the mediation will be permitted to have in attendance at mediation, a supporting person of the party's choice including but not limited to an attorney or advocate.] all of the conditions specified in subsection (b) are met. (e) For the purposes of this section, "domestic abuse" has the same meaning as defined in section 586-1." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.